Illinois, session 104th, SB3875.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by adding Section 17.10 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3305/17.10 new)7    Sec. 17.10. Local business licenses. Notwithstanding any 8other provision of law, any suspension or revocation of a 9business license under this Act must be approved by:10        (1) the majority vote of the county board of the 11    county in the business is located, if the business is not 12    located within a municipality; or13        (2) the majority vote of the corporate authorities of 14    the municipality in which the business is located, if the 15    business is located within a municipality.